zh-TW: 聲納成像模式: 360 度成像; CHIRP; ClearVü; 向下成像; 雙波束; 前向成像; 即時成像; 側向成像; 傳統 2D; 其他
es: Modos de imagen del sonar: Imagen 360; CHIRP; ClearVü; Imagen inferior; Doble haz; Imagen frontal; Imagen en vivo; Imagen lateral; 2D tradicional; Otros
vi: Chế độ hình ảnh sonar: Hình ảnh 360; CHIRP; ClearVü; Hình ảnh phía dưới; Chùm tia kép; Hình ảnh phía trước; Hình ảnh trực tiếp; Hình ảnh hai bên; 2D truyền thống; Khác
pt-BR: Modos de imagem do sonar: Imagem 360; CHIRP; ClearVü; Imagem inferior; Feixe duplo; Imagem frontal; Imagem ao vivo; Imagem lateral; 2D tradicional; Outro
de: Sonar-Bildgebungsmodi: 360-Grad-Bildgebung; CHIRP; ClearVü; Down Imaging; Dualstrahl; Forward Imaging; Live Imaging; Side Imaging; Traditionell 2D; Sonstiges
en: Sonar imaging modes: 360 Imaging; CHIRP; ClearVü; Down Imaging; Dual-beam; Forward Imaging; Live Imaging; Side Imaging; Traditional 2D; Other
nl: Sonar beeldvormingsmodi: 360 beeldvorming; CHIRP; ClearVü; Neerwaartse beeldvorming; Dubbelstraal; Voorwaartse beeldvorming; Live beeldvorming; Zijwaartse beeldvorming; Traditionele 2D; Andere
nb: Ekkoloddsmoduser: 360-avbildning; CHIRP; ClearVü; Nedavbildning; Dobbel stråle; Foroveravbildning; Sanntidsavbildning; Sideavbildning; Tradisjonell 2D; Annet
sl-SI: Načini sonarskega slikanja: 360 slikanje; CHIRP; ClearVü; Slikanje navzdol; Dvojni žarek; Slikanje naprej; Slikanje v živo; Stransko slikanje; Tradicionalni 2D; Drugo
ro-RO: Moduri de imagine sonar: Imagistică 360; CHIRP; ClearVü; Imagistică de adâncime; Fascicul dublu; Imagistică frontală; Imagistică în timp real; Imagistică laterală; 2D tradițional; Altele
sk-SK: Režimy sonarového zobrazovania: 360° zobrazovanie; CHIRP; ClearVü; Spodné zobrazovanie; Dvojlúčové; Predné zobrazovanie; Živé zobrazovanie; Bočné zobrazovanie; Tradičné 2D; Iné
el: Λειτουργίες απεικόνισης σόναρ: Απεικόνιση 360; CHIRP; ClearVü; Απεικόνιση προς τα κάτω; Διπλής δέσμης; Απεικόνιση προς τα εμπρός; Ζωντανή απεικόνιση; Πλευρική απεικόνιση; Παραδοσιακό 2D; Άλλο
it: Modalità di imaging sonar: Imaging a 360 gradi; CHIRP; ClearVü; Imaging verso il basso; Doppio fascio; Imaging frontale; Imaging dal vivo; Imaging laterale; 2D tradizionale; Altro
th: โหมดภาพโซนาร์: ภาพ 360 องศา; CHIRP; ClearVü; ภาพด้านล่าง; ลำคลื่นคู่; ภาพด้านหน้า; ภาพสด; ภาพด้านข้าง; 2D แบบดั้งเดิม; อื่นๆ
ko: 소나 이미징 모드: 360도 이미징; CHIRP; ClearVü; 다운 이미징; 듀얼빔; 포워드 이미징; 라이브 이미징; 사이드 이미징; 전통적인 2D; 기타
hr-HR: Načini sonarskog snimanja: Snimanje 360; CHIRP; ClearVü; Snimanje prema dolje; Dvostruki snop; Snimanje prema naprijed; Snimanje uživo; Bočno snimanje; Tradicionalno 2D; Ostalo
sv: Ekolodsbildlägen: 360-avbildning; CHIRP; ClearVü; Nedavbildning; Dubbelstråle; Framåtavbildning; Levande avbildning; Sidoavbildning; Traditionell 2D; Övrigt
da: Sonarbilledtilstande: 360-billeddannelse; CHIRP; ClearVü; Nedbilleddannelse; Dobbeltstråle; Fremadrettet billeddannelse; Live-billeddannelse; Sidebilleddannelse; Traditionel 2D; Andet
bg-BG: Режими на сонарно изображение: 360 изображение; CHIRP; ClearVü; Изображение надолу; Двоен лъч; Изображение напред; Изображение на живо; Странично изображение; Традиционен 2D; Други
ru: Режимы сонарной визуализации: 360-градусная визуализация; CHIRP; ClearVü; Визуализация вниз; Двухлучевой; Визуализация вперёд; Визуализация в реальном времени; Боковая визуализация; Традиционный 2D; Другой
hu: Szonár képalkotási módok: 360 fokos képalkotás; CHIRP; ClearVü; Lefelé irányuló képalkotás; Kettős sugár; Előre irányuló képalkotás; Élő képalkotás; Oldalsó képalkotás; Hagyományos 2D; Egyéb
fi: Kaikuluotaimen kuvantamistilat: 360-kuvantaminen; CHIRP; ClearVü; Alaskuvantaminen; Kaksoiskeila; Eteenpäin kuvantaminen; Reaaliaikainen kuvantaminen; Sivukuvantaminen; Perinteinen 2D; Muu
fr: Modes d’imagerie sonar: Imagerie 360; CHIRP; ClearVü; Imagerie vers le bas; Double faisceau; Imagerie vers l'avant; Imagerie en direct; Imagerie latérale; 2D traditionnel; Autre
pt-PT: Modos de imagem do sonar: Imagem 360; CHIRP; ClearVü; Imagem inferior; Feixe duplo; Imagem frontal; Imagem ao vivo; Imagem lateral; 2D tradicional; Outro
ja: ソナーイメージングモード: 360イメージング; CHIRP; ClearVü; ダウンイメージング; デュアルビーム; フォワードイメージング; ライブイメージング; サイドイメージング; 従来型2D; その他
tr: Sonar görüntüleme modları: 360 görüntüleme; CHIRP; ClearVü; Aşağı görüntüleme; Çift ışın; İleri görüntüleme; Canlı görüntüleme; Yan görüntüleme; Geleneksel 2D; Diğer
zh-CN: 声纳成像模式: 360 度成像; CHIRP; ClearVü; 下视成像; 双波束; 前视成像; 实时成像; 侧视成像; 传统 2D; 其他
cs: Režimy sonaru: 360° zobrazování; CHIRP; ClearVü; Zobrazování dolů; Dvoupaprsek; Zobrazování vpřed; Živé zobrazování; Boční zobrazování; Tradiční 2D; Jiné
lt-LT: Sonaro vaizdo režimai: 360 vaizdas; CHIRP; ClearVü; Žemyn nukreiptas vaizdas; Dviejų spindulių; Pirmyn nukreiptas vaizdas; Tiesioginis vaizdas; Šoninis vaizdas; Tradicinis 2D; Kita
pl: Tryby obrazowania sonarem: Obrazowanie 360; CHIRP; ClearVü; Obrazowanie w dół; Podwójna wiązka; Obrazowanie do przodu; Obrazowanie na żywo; Obrazowanie boczne; Tradycyjny 2D; Inne